Tennessee, session 114, HB0586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-409(d)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(2)
(A) Of the taxes collected under this section:
(i) Five percent (5%) must be retained by county registers as
commission for collecting and reporting the taxes levied under this
section; and
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) must be retained by the county register
and transferred and deposited in the county general fund without being
designated for a specific purpose.
(B) The remainder of the taxes collected must be remitted to the state
treasurer to be deposited to the funds enumerated in subsections (g), (i), (j), and
(l), subject to the allocation provided in subsection (m), and to the general fund of
the state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0586
000898
- 1 -